Washington statutes.
RCW 18.54.920

RCW 43.24.060 and 43.24.120 not applicable to optometry.

The provisions of RCW 43.24.060 and 43.24.120 are not applicable to the licensing and regulation of the practice of optometry.

[ 1999 c 240 s 6; 1963 c 25 s 18.]

NOTES:

Examining committee reconstituted as optometry board: RCW 18.54.020.